Nebraska, session 109, LB265.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce Development Pilot Investment Act.
Sec. 2. The purpose of the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce
Development Pilot Investment Act is to:
(1) Provide one-time grants to eligible manufacturing operations for new
and existing capital investments that will increase or lead to the adoption and
integration of smart technologies and increased productivity; and
(2) Provide a positive economic impact in the State of Nebraska.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce
Development Pilot Investment Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Labor;
(2) Eligible manufacturing operation means a manufacturer of goods at a
facility located in this state that:
(a) Has a North American Industry Classification System number within the
manufacturing sector range of 31 to 33;
(b) Has been an established business for a minimum of three years prior to
the date of application for the grant;
(c) Derives a minimum of fifty-one percent of the manufacturer's gross
revenue from the sale of manufactured goods;
(d) Employs a minimum of three full-time employees; and
(e) Demonstrates the ability to provide private matching financial support
for the manufacturer's manufacturing modernization investment project on a one-
to-one basis;
(3) Manufacturing modernization investment project means a project that is
intended to lead to the adoption and integration of smart technologies into
existing manufacturing operations located in the state by mitigating the risk
to the manufacturer of significant technology investments. Manufacturing
modernization investment project includes, but is not limited to, an investment
in the following that are intended to assist a manufacturer in increasing the
manufacturer's productivity, efficiency, and competitiveness:
(a) Job training; and
(b) Specialized hardware, software, or other equipment; and
(4) Private matching financial support means any financial support derived
from a source other than a direct appropriation from the State of Nebraska or
its political subdivisions.
Sec. 4. (1) Beginning October 1, 2025, through November 1, 2026, an
eligible manufacturing operation may apply to the department for a grant. The
application shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:
(a) A description of the manufacturing modernization investment project;
(b) The estimated cost of the manufacturing modernization investment
project; and
(c) Documentation on the amount of private matching financial support
available for the manufacturing modernization investment project that has been
received or will be received by the eligible manufacturing operation. Such
amount shall be at least equal to the amount of any grant received under the
Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce Development Pilot Investment Act. The
documentation provided under this subdivision does not need to identify any
provider of private matching financial support.
(2) The department shall consider applications in the order in which they
are received. If an applicant is an eligible manufacturing operation and
otherwise qualifies for a grant, the department shall, subject to subsection
(3) of this section, approve the application and notify the applicant of the
approval.
(3) The department may approve applications within the limits of available
funding under the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce Development Pilot
-1-

LB265 LB265
2025 2025
Investment Act. The amount of any grant approved shall be equal to the amount
of money supplied by the eligible manufacturing operation from providers of
private matching financial support, as documented under subdivision (1)(c) of
this section, except that no grant shall be for more than fifty thousand
dollars.
Sec. 5. (1) The department shall not approve an application for a
manufacturing modernization investment project that was commenced prior to the
date of the application.
(2) Any eligible manufacturing operation that no longer meets the
requirements of subdivision (2) of section 3 of this act shall repay any grant
funds received under the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce Development
Pilot Investment Act.
Sec. 6. The department may award up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars
in grants from the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund for purposes of
carrying out the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce Development Pilot
Investment Act.
Sec. 7. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce Development Pilot
Investment Act.
Sec. 8. Section 48-602, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-602 For purposes of the Employment Security Law, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Agricultural labor means services performed:
(a) On a farm, in the employ of any employer, in connection with
cultivating the soil or in connection with raising or harvesting any
agricultural or horticultural commodity, including the raising, shearing,
feeding, caring for, training, and management of livestock, bees, poultry, fur-
bearing animals, and wildlife;
(b) In the employ of the owner, tenant, or other operator of a farm, in
connection with the operation, management, conservation, improvement, or
maintenance of such farm and its tools and equipment or in salvaging timber or
clearing land of brush and other debris left by a windstorm, if the major part
of such service is performed on a farm;
(c) In connection with the production or harvesting of any commodity in
connection with the operation or maintenance of ditches, canals, reservoirs, or
waterways, not owned or operated for profit, used exclusively for supplying and
storing water for farming purposes;
(d)(i) In the employ of the operator of a farm in handling, planting,
drying, packing, packaging, processing, freezing, grading, storing, or
delivering to storage or to market or to a carrier for transportation to
market, in its unmanufactured state, any agricultural or horticultural
commodity, but only if such operator produced more than one-half of the
commodity with respect to which such service is performed, or (ii) in the
employ of a group of operators of farms, or a cooperative organization of which
such operators are members, in the performance of service described in
subdivision (1)(d)(i) of this section, but only if such operators produced more
than one-half of the commodity with respect to which such service is performed.
Subdivisions (1)(d)(i) and (ii) of this section shall not be deemed to be
applicable with respect to service performed in connection with commercial
canning or commercial freezing or in connection with any agricultural or
horticultural commodity after its delivery to a terminal market for
distribution for consumption; or
(e) On a farm operated for profit if such service is not in the course of
the employer's trade or business;
(2) Base period means the first four of the last five completed calendar
quarters immediately preceding the first day of an individual's benefit year,
except that if the individual is not monetarily eligible for unemployment
benefits as determined pursuant to section 48-627.01 based upon wages paid
during the first four of the five most recently completed calendar quarters,
the department shall make a redetermination of monetary eligibility based upon
an alternative base period which consists of the last four completed calendar
quarters immediately preceding the first day of the claimant's benefit year;
(3) Benefits means the money payments payable to an individual with
respect to his or her unemployment;
(4) Benefit year, with respect to any individual, means the one-year
period beginning with the first day of the first week with respect to which the
individual first files a valid claim for benefits, and thereafter the one-year
period beginning with the first day of the first week with respect to which the
individual next files a valid claim for benefits after the termination of his
or her last preceding benefit year. Any claim for benefits made in accordance
with section 48-629 shall be deemed to be a valid claim for the purpose of this
subdivision if the individual has been paid the wages for insured work required
under section 48-627.01. For the purposes of this subdivision a week with
respect to which an individual files a valid claim shall be deemed to be in,
within, or during that benefit year which includes the greater part of such
week;
(5) Calendar quarter means the period of three consecutive calendar months
ending on March 31, June 30, September 30, or December 31, or the equivalent
thereof as the Commissioner of Labor may by rule and regulation prescribe;
(6) Client means any individual, partnership, limited liability company,
corporation, or other legally recognized entity that contracts with a
professional employer organization to obtain professional employer services
-2-

LB265 LB265
2025 2025
relating to worksite employees through a professional employer agreement;
(7) Combined tax means the employer liability consisting of contributions
and the state unemployment insurance tax;
(8) Combined tax rate means the rate which is applied to wages to
determine the combined taxes due;
(9) Commissioner means the Commissioner of Labor;
(10) Commodity means an agricultural commodity as defined in section 15(g)
of the federal Agricultural Marketing Act, as amended, 12 U.S.C. 1141j;
(11) Contribution rate means the percentage of the combined tax rate used
to determine the contribution portion of the combined tax;
(12) Contributions means that portion of the combined tax based upon the
contribution rate portion of the combined tax rate which is deposited in the
state Unemployment Compensation Fund as required by sections 48-648 and 48-649
to 48-649.04;
(13) Crew leader means an individual who furnishes individuals to perform
service in agricultural labor for any other person, pays, either on his or her
own behalf or on behalf of such other person, the individuals so furnished by
him or her for the service in agricultural labor performed by them, and has not
entered into a written agreement with such other person under which such
individual is designated as an employee of such other person;
(14) Department means the Department of Labor;
(15) Employers engaged in the construction industry means all employers
primarily engaged in business activities classified as sector 23 business
activities under the North American Industry Classification System;
(16) Employment office means a free public employment office or branch
thereof, operated by this state or maintained as a part of a state-controlled
system of public employment offices, including public employment offices
operated by an agency of a foreign government;
(17) Farm means stock, dairy, poultry, fruit, fur-bearing animal, and
truck farms, plantations, ranches, nurseries, ranges, greenhouses, or other
similar structures used primarily for the raising of agricultural or
horticultural commodities, and orchards;
(18) Fund means the Unemployment Compensation Fund established by section
48-617 to which all contributions and payments in lieu of contributions
required and from which all benefits provided shall be paid;
(19) Hearing officer means a person employed by the Department of Labor
who conducts hearings, contested cases, or other proceedings pursuant to the
Employment Security Law;
(20) Hospital means an institution which has been licensed, certified, or
approved by the Department of Health and Human Services as a hospital;
(21) Insured work means employment for employers;
(22) Leave of absence means any absence from work: (a) Mutually and
voluntarily agreed to by the employer and the employee; (b) mutually and
voluntarily agreed to between the employer and the employee's bargaining agent;
or (c) to which the employee is entitled as a matter of state or federal law;
(23) Paid vacation leave means a period of time while employed or
following separation from employment in which the individual renders no
services to the employer but is entitled to receive vacation pay equal to or
exceeding his or her base weekly wage;
(24) Payments in lieu of contributions means the money payments to the
Unemployment Compensation Fund required by sections 48-649.04, 48-652,
48-660.01, and 48-661;
(25) Professional employer agreement means a written professional employer
services contract whereby:
(a) A professional employer organization agrees to provide payroll
services, employee benefit administration, or personnel services for a majority
of the employees providing services to the client at a client worksite;
(b) The agreement is intended to be ongoing rather than temporary in
nature; and
(c) Employer responsibilities for worksite employees, including those of
hiring, firing, and disciplining, are shared between the professional employer
organization and the client by contract. The term professional employer
agreement shall not include a contract between a parent corporation, company,
or other entity and a wholly owned subsidiary;
(26) Professional employer organization means any individual, partnership,
limited liability company, corporation, or other legally recognized entity that
enters into a professional employer agreement with a client or clients for a
majority of a client's workforce at a client worksite. The term professional
employer organization does not include an insurer as defined in section 44-103
or a temporary help firm;
(27) Standard rate means the rate assigned to category twenty for that
year under section 48-649.03. The standard rate shall be not less than five and
four-tenths percent of the employer's annual taxable payroll;
(28) State includes, in addition to the states of the United States of
America, any dependency of the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico,
the Virgin Islands, and the District of Columbia;
(29) State unemployment insurance tax means that portion of the combined
tax which is based upon the state unemployment insurance tax rate portion of
the combined tax rate and which is deposited in the Workforce Development
Program Cash State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund as required by sections
48-648 and 48-649 to 48-649.04;
(30) State unemployment insurance tax rate means the percentage of the
combined tax rate used to determine the state unemployment insurance tax
-3-

LB265 LB265
2025 2025
portion of the combined tax;
(31) Temporary employee means an employee of a temporary help firm
assigned to work for the clients of such temporary help firm;
(32) Temporary help firm means a firm that hires its own employees and
assigns them to clients to support or supplement the client's workforce in work
situations such as employee absences, temporary skill shortages, seasonal
workloads, and special assignments and projects;
(33) Unemployed means an individual during any week in which the
individual performs no service and with respect to which no wages are payable
to the individual or any week of less than full-time work if the wages payable
with respect to such week are less than the individual's weekly benefit amount,
but does not include any individual on a leave of absence or on paid vacation
leave. When an agreement between the employer and a bargaining unit
representative does not allocate vacation pay allowance or pay in lieu of
vacation to a specified period of time during a period of temporary layoff or
plant shutdown, the payment by the employer or his or her designated
representative will be deemed to be wages as defined in this section in the
week or weeks the vacation is actually taken;
(34) Unemployment Trust Fund means the trust fund in the Treasury of the
United States of America established under section 904 of the federal Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1104, as such section existed on January 1, 2015, which
receives credit from the state Unemployment Compensation Fund;
(35) Wages, except with respect to services performed in employment as
provided in subdivisions (4)(c) and (d) of section 48-604, means all
remuneration for personal services, including commissions and bonuses,
remuneration for personal services paid under a contract of hire, and the cash
value of all remunerations in any medium other than cash. The reasonable cash
value of remuneration in any medium other than cash shall be estimated and
determined in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by
the commissioner. Wages includes tips which are received while performing
services which constitute employment and which are included in a written
statement furnished to the employer pursuant to section 6053(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01.
With respect to services performed in employment in agricultural labor as
is provided in subdivision (4)(c) of section 48-604, wages means cash
remuneration and the cash value of commodities not intended for personal
consumption by the worker and his or her immediate family for such services.
With respect to services performed in employment in domestic service as is
provided in subdivision (4)(d) of section 48-604, wages means cash remuneration
for such services.
The term wages does not include:
(a) The amount of any payment, including any amount paid by an employer
for insurance or annuities or into a fund to provide for such payment, made to,
or on behalf of, an individual in employment or any of his or her dependents
under a plan or system established by an employer which makes provision for
such individuals generally or for a class or classes of such individuals,
including any amount paid by an employer for insurance or annuities or into a
fund to provide for any such payment, on account of (i) sickness or accident
disability, except, in the case of payments made to an employee or any of his
or her dependents, this subdivision (i) shall exclude from wages only payments
which are received under a workers' compensation law, (ii) medical and
hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability, or
(iii) death;
(b) The payment by an employer, without deduction from the remuneration of
the employee, of the tax imposed upon an employee under section 3101 of the
Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01;
(c) Any payment on account of sickness or accident disability, or medical
or hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability,
made by an employer to, or on behalf of, an individual after the expiration of
six calendar months following the last calendar month in which such individual
worked for such employer;
(d) Any payment made to, or on behalf of, an individual or his or her
beneficiary (i) from or to a trust described in section 401(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01 which is exempt from tax under
section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01 at
the time of such payment unless such payment is made to an employee of the
trust as remuneration for services rendered as such employee and not as a
beneficiary of the trust or (ii) under or to an annuity plan which, at the time
of such payment, meets the requirements of section 401 of the Internal Revenue
Code as defined in section 49-801.01;
(e) Any payment made to, or on behalf of, an employee or his or her
beneficiary (i) under a simplified employee pension as defined by the
commissioner, (ii) under or to an annuity contract as defined by the
commissioner, other than a payment for the purchase of such contract which is
made by reason of a salary reduction agreement, whether evidenced by a written
instrument or otherwise, (iii) under or to an exempt governmental deferred
compensation plan as defined by the commissioner, (iv) to supplement pension
benefits under a plan or trust, as defined by the commissioner, to take into
account some portion or all of the increase in the cost of living since
retirement, but only if such supplemental payments are under a plan which is
treated as a welfare plan, or (v) under a cafeteria benefits plan;
(f) Remuneration paid in any medium other than cash to an individual for
service not in the course of the employer's trade or business;
-4-

LB265 LB265
2025 2025
(g) Benefits paid under a supplemental unemployment benefit plan which
satisfies the eight points set forth in Internal Revenue Service Revenue Ruling
56-249 as the ruling existed on January 1, 2015, and is in compliance with the
standards set forth in Internal Revenue Service Revenue Rulings 58-128 and
60-330 as the rulings existed on January 1, 2015; and
(h) Remuneration for service performed in the employ of any state in the
exercise of his or her duties as a member of the Army National Guard or Air
National Guard or in the employ of the United States of America as a member of
any military reserve unit;
(36) Week means such period of seven consecutive days as the commissioner
may by rule and regulation prescribe;
(37) Week of unemployment with respect to any individual means any week
during which he or she performs less than full-time work and the wages payable
to him or her with respect to such week are less than his or her weekly benefit
amount;
(38) Wholly owned subsidiary means a corporation, company, or other entity
which has eighty percent or more of its outstanding voting stock or membership
owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by the parent entity; and
(39) Worksite employee has the same meaning as the term covered employee
in section 48-2702.
Sec. 9. Section 48-622.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
48-622.01 (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury a special
fund to be known as the State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund. The fund
terminates on July 1, 2025, and the State Treasurer shall transfer any money in
the fund on such date to the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund. Beginning
July 1, 2025, all All state unemployment insurance tax collected under sections
48-648 to 48-661, less refunds, shall be paid into the Workforce Development
Program Cash Fund fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund
and the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Such money shall be held in trust for payment of unemployment
insurance benefits. Any money in the State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act, except that interest earned on money in the fund shall be
credited to the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund at the end of each
calendar quarter.
(2) The commissioner shall have the authority to determine when and in
what amounts withdrawals from the State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund for
payment of benefits are necessary. Amounts withdrawn for payment of benefits
shall be immediately forwarded to the Secretary of the Treasury of the United
States of America to the credit of the state's account in the Unemployment
Trust Fund, any provision of law in this state relating to the deposit,
administration, release, or disbursement of money in the possession or custody
of this state to the contrary notwithstanding.
(3) If and when the state unemployment insurance tax ceases to exist as
determined by the Governor, all money then in the State Unemployment Insurance
Trust Fund less accrued interest shall be immediately transferred to the credit
of the state's account in the Unemployment Trust Fund, any provision of law in
this state relating to the deposit, administration, release, or disbursement of
money in the possession or custody of this state to the contrary
notwithstanding. The determination to eliminate the state unemployment
insurance tax shall be based on the solvency of the state's account in the
Unemployment Trust Fund and the need for training of Nebraska workers. Accrued
interest in the State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund shall be credited to
the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund.
Sec. 10. Section 48-622.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
48-622.02 (1) The Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund is created. The
fund terminates on July 1, 2025, and the State Treasurer shall transfer any
money in the fund on such date to the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund.
Grants awarded from the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund prior to the
transfer but remaining unpaid on July 1, 2025, may be paid from the Workforce
Development Program Cash Fund if all conditions of the grant award have been
met. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. No expenditures shall be made from the
Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund without the written authorization of
the Governor upon the recommendation of the commissioner. Transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
interest earned on money in the State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund shall
be credited to the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund.
(2) Money in the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund shall be used for
(a) administrative costs of establishing, assessing, collecting, and
maintaining state unemployment insurance tax liability and payments, (b)
administrative costs of creating, operating, maintaining, and dissolving the
State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund and the Nebraska Training and Support
Cash Fund, (c) support of public and private job training programs designed to
train, retrain, or upgrade work skills of existing Nebraska workers of for-
profit and not-for-profit businesses, (d) recruitment of workers to Nebraska,
(e) training new employees of expanding Nebraska businesses, (f) retention of
existing employees of Nebraska businesses, (g) the costs of creating a common
web portal for the attraction of businesses and workers to Nebraska, (h)
-5-

LB265 LB265
2025 2025
developing and conducting labor availability and skills gap studies pursuant to
the Sector Partnership Program Act, for which money may be transferred to the
Sector Partnership Program Fund as directed by the Legislature, and (i) payment
of unemployment insurance benefits if solvency of the state's account in the
Unemployment Trust Fund and of the State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund so
require.
(3) The Administrative Costs Reserve Account is created within the
Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund. Money shall be allocated from the
Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund to the Administrative Costs Reserve
Account in amounts sufficient to pay the anticipated administrative costs
identified in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred fifty thousand dollars
from the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund to the Sector Partnership
Program Fund no later than July 15, 2016.
Sec. 11. Section 48-626, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
48-626 (1) For any benefit year beginning before July 21, 2022, any
otherwise eligible individual shall be entitled during any benefit year to a
total amount of benefits equal to whichever is the lesser of (a) twenty-six
times his or her weekly benefit amount or (b) one-third of his or her wages in
the employment of each employer per calendar quarter of his or her base period;
except that when any individual has been separated from his or her employment
with a base period employer under circumstances under which he or she was or
could have been determined disqualified under section 48-628.10 or 48-628.12,
the total benefit amount based on the employment from which he or she was so
separated shall be reduced by an amount determined pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section, but not more than one reduction may be made for each
separation. In no event shall the benefit amount based on employment for any
employer be reduced to less than one benefit week when the individual was or
could have been determined disqualified under section 48-628.12.
(2) For purposes of determining the reduction of benefits described in
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) If the claimant has been separated from his or her employment under
circumstances under which he or she was or could have been determined
disqualified under section 48-628.12, his or her total benefit amount shall be
reduced by:
(i) Two times his or her weekly benefit amount if he or she left work
voluntarily for the sole purpose of accepting previously secured, permanent,
full-time, insured work, which he or she does accept, which offers a reasonable
expectation of betterment of wages or working conditions, or both, and for
which he or she earns wages payable to him or her; or
(ii) Thirteen times his or her weekly benefit amount if he or she left
work voluntarily without good cause for any reason other than that described in
subdivision (2)(a)(i) of this section; and
(b) If the claimant has been separated from his or her employment under
circumstances under which he or she was or could have been determined
disqualified under section 48-628.10, his or her total benefit amount shall be
reduced by fourteen times his or her weekly benefit amount.
(3) For any benefit year beginning on or after July 21, 2022, any
otherwise eligible individual shall be entitled during any benefit year to a
total amount of benefits equal to whichever is the lesser of (a) twenty-six
times his or her weekly benefit amount or (b) one-third of his or her wages in
the employment of each employer per calendar quarter of his or her base period;
except that when any individual has been separated from his or her employment
with the most recent insured employer under circumstances under which he or she
was or could have been determined disqualified under section 48-628.10 or
48-628.12, the total benefit amount based on the employment from which he or
she was so separated shall be reduced by an amount determined pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section, but not more than one reduction may be made for
such separation. In no event shall the benefit amount based on employment for
any employer be reduced to less than one benefit week when the individual was
or could have been determined disqualified under section 48-628.12.
(4) For purposes of determining the reduction of benefits described in
subsection (3) of this section:
(a) If the claimant has been separated from his or her employment under
circumstances under which he or she was or could have been determined
disqualified under section 48-628.12, his or her total benefit amount shall be
reduced by thirteen times his or her weekly benefit amount if he or she left
work voluntarily without good cause; and
(b) If the claimant has been separated from his or her employment under
circumstances under which he or she was or could have been determined
disqualified under section 48-628.10, his or her total benefit amount shall be
reduced by fourteen times his or her weekly benefit amount.
(5) For purposes of sections 48-623 to 48-626, wages shall be counted as
wages for insured work for benefit purposes with respect to any benefit year
only if such benefit year begins subsequent to the date on which the employer
by whom such wages were paid has satisfied the conditions of section 48-603 or
subsection (3) of section 48-661 with respect to becoming an employer.
(6) In order to determine the benefits due under this section and sections
48-624 and 48-625, each employer shall make reports, in conformity with
reasonable rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commissioner,
of the wages of any claimant. If any employer fails to make such a report
within the time prescribed, the commissioner may accept the statement of such
-6-

LB265 LB265
2025 2025
claimant as to his or her wages, and any benefit payments based on such
statement of earnings, in the absence of fraud or collusion, shall be final as
to the amount.
(7) It is the intent of the Legislature that the amount of benefits to
which an eligible individual is entitled shall not be affected by any changes
made in this legislative bill.
Sec. 12. Section 48-648, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-648 (1) With respect to wages for employment, combined tax shall accrue
and become payable by each employer not otherwise entitled to make payments in
lieu of contributions for each calendar year in which he or she is subject to
the Employment Security Law. Such combined tax shall become due and be paid by
each employer to the commissioner for the Workforce Development Program Cash
State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund and the Unemployment Trust Fund in such
manner and at such times as the commissioner may, by rule and regulation,
prescribe. Such combined tax shall not be deducted, in whole or in part, from
the wages of individuals in such employer's employ.
(2) The commissioner may require any employer whose annual payroll for
either of the two preceding calendar years has equaled or exceeded one hundred
thousand dollars to file combined tax returns and pay combined taxes owed by an
electronic method approved by the commissioner, except when the employer
establishes to the satisfaction of the commissioner that filing the combined
tax return or payment of the tax by an electronic method would create a
hardship for the employer.
(3) In the payment of any combined tax, a fractional part of a cent shall
be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which case it
shall be increased to one cent. If the combined tax due for any reporting
period is less than five dollars, the employer need not remit the combined tax.
(4) If two or more related corporations or limited liability companies
concurrently employ the same individual and compensate such individual through
a common paymaster which is one of such corporations or limited liability
companies, each such corporation or limited liability company shall be
considered to have paid as remuneration to such individual only the amounts
actually disbursed by it to such individual and shall not be considered to have
paid as remuneration to such individual amounts actually disbursed to such
individual by another of such corporations or limited liability companies. An
employee of a wholly owned subsidiary shall be considered to be concurrently
employed by the parent corporation, company, or other entity and the wholly
owned subsidiary whether or not both companies separately provide remuneration.
(5) The professional employer organization shall report and pay combined
tax, penalties, and interest owed for wages earned by worksite employees under
the client's employer account number using the client's combined tax rate. The
client is liable for the payment of unpaid combined tax, penalties, and
interest owed for wages paid to worksite employees, and the worksite employees
shall be considered employees of the client for purposes of the Employment
Security Law.
(6) The Commissioner of Labor may require by rule and regulation that each
employer subject to the Employment Security Law shall submit to the
commissioner quarterly wage reports on such forms and in such manner as the
commissioner may prescribe. The commissioner may require any employer whose
annual payroll for either of the two preceding calendar years has equaled or
exceeded one hundred thousand dollars to file wage reports by an electronic
method approved by the commissioner, except when the employer establishes to
the satisfaction of the commissioner that filing by an electronic method would
create a hardship for the employer. The quarterly wage reports shall be used by
the commissioner to make monetary determinations of claims for benefits.
Sec. 13. Section 48-649.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-649.01 (1) By December 1 of each calendar year, the commissioner shall
determine the state unemployment insurance tax rate for the following year
based on information available through the department. The state unemployment
insurance tax rate shall be zero percent if:
(a) The average balance in the State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund at
the end of any three months in the preceding calendar year is greater than one
percent of state taxable wages for the same preceding year; or
(b) The balance in the State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund equals or
exceeds thirty percent of the average month end balance of the state's account
in the Unemployment Trust Fund for the three lowest calendar months in the
preceding year.
(2) If the state unemployment insurance tax rate is determined to be zero
percent pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the contribution rate for
all employers shall equal one hundred percent of the combined tax rate.
(3) If the state unemployment insurance tax rate is not zero percent as
determined in this section, the combined tax rate shall be divided so that not
less than eighty percent of the combined tax rate equals the contribution rate
and not more than twenty percent of the combined tax rate equals the state
unemployment insurance tax rate except for employers who are assigned a
combined tax rate of five and four-tenths percent or more. For those employers,
the state unemployment insurance tax rate shall equal zero and their combined
tax rate shall equal their contribution rate.
Sec. 14. Section 48-649.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
48-649.03 (1) Once benefits have been payable from and chargeable to an
-7-

LB265 LB265
2025 2025
employer's experience account throughout the preceding four calendar quarters
and wages for employment have been paid by the employer in each of the two
preceding four-calendar-quarter periods, the employer's combined tax rate shall
be calculated according to this section. The combined tax rate shall be based
upon the employer's experience rating record and determined from the employer's
reserve ratio.
(2) The employer's reserve ratio is the percent obtained by dividing (a)
the amount by which the employer's contributions credited from the time the
employer first or most recently became an employer, whichever date is later,
and up to and including September 30 of the year the rate computation is made,
plus any part of the employer's contributions due for that year paid on or
before October 31 of such year, exceed the employer's benefits charged during
the same period, by (b) the employer's average annual taxable payroll for the
sixteen-consecutive-calendar-quarter period ending September 30 of the year in
which the rate computation is made. For an employer with less than sixteen
consecutive calendar quarters of contribution experience, the employer's
average taxable payroll shall be determined based upon the four-calendar-
quarter periods for which contributions were payable.
(3) Each eligible experience rated employer shall be assigned to one of
twenty rate categories with a corresponding experience factor as follows:
Category Experience Factor
1 0.00
2 0.25
3 0.40
4 0.45
5 0.50
6 0.60
7 0.65
8 0.70
9 0.80
10 0.90
11 0.95
12 1.00
13 1.05
14 1.10
15 1.20
16 1.35
17 1.55
18 1.80
19 2.15
20 2.60
Eligible experience rated employers shall be assigned to rate categories
from highest to lowest according to their experience reserve ratio, with
category one assigned to accounts with the highest reserve ratios and category
twenty assigned to accounts with the lowest reserve ratios. Each category shall
be limited to no more than five percent of the state's total taxable payroll,
except that:
(a) Any employer with a portion of its taxable wages falling into two
consecutive categories shall be assigned to the lower category;
(b) No employer with a reserve ratio calculated to five decimal places
equal to the similarly calculated reserve ratio of another employer shall be
assigned to a higher rate than the employer to which it has the equal reserve
ratio; and
(c) No employer with a positive experience account balance shall be
assigned to category twenty.
(4) The state's reserve ratio shall be calculated annually by dividing the
amount available to pay benefits in the Unemployment Trust Fund and the State
Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund as of September 30, plus any amount of
combined tax owed by employers eligible for and electing annual payment status
for the four most recent quarters ending on September 30 in accordance with
-8-

LB265 LB265
2025 2025
rules and regulations adopted by the commissioner, by the state's total wages
from the four calendar quarters ending on September 30. For purposes of this
section, total wages means all remuneration paid by an employer in employment.
The state's reserve ratio shall be applied to the table in this subsection to
determine the yield factor for the upcoming rate year.
State's Reserve Ratio Yield Factor
1.75 percent and above = 0.50
1.60 percent up to but not including 1.75 = 0.60
1.45 percent up to but not including 1.60 = 0.70
1.30 percent up to but not including 1.45 = 0.75
1.15 percent up to but not including 1.30 = 0.80
1.00 percent up to but not including 1.15 = 0.90
0.85 percent up to but not including 1.00 = 1.00
0.70 percent up to but not including 0.85 = 1.10
0.60 percent up to but not including 0.70 = 1.20
0.50 percent up to but not including 0.60 = 1.25
0.45 percent up to but not including 0.50 = 1.30
0.40 percent up to but not including 0.45 = 1.35
0.35 percent up to but not including 0.40 = 1.40
0.30 percent up to but not including 0.35 = 1.45
Below 0.30 percent = 1.50
The commissioner may adjust the yield factor determined pursuant to the
preceding table to a lower scheduled yield factor if the state's reserve ratio
is 1.00 percent or greater. Once the yield factor for the upcoming rate year
has been determined, it is multiplied by the amount of unemployment benefits
paid from combined tax during the four calendar quarters ending September 30 of
the preceding year. The resulting figure is the planned yield for the rate
year. The planned yield is divided by the total taxable wages for the four
calendar quarters ending September 30 of the previous year and carried to four
decimal places to create the average combined tax rate for the rate year.
Beginning January 1, 2025, through December 31, 2029, the final average
combined tax rate shall be reduced by five percent.
(5) The average combined tax rate is assigned to rate category twelve as
established in subsection (3) of this section. Rates for each of the remaining
nineteen categories are determined by multiplying the average combined tax rate
by the experience factor associated with each category and carried to four
decimal places. Employers who are delinquent in filing their combined tax
reports as of October 31 of any year shall be assigned to category twenty for
the following calendar year unless the delinquency is corrected prior to
December 31 of the year of rate calculation.
(6) In addition to required contributions, an employer may make voluntary
contributions to the fund to be credited to his or her account. Voluntary
contributions by employers may be made up to the amount necessary to qualify
for one rate category reduction. Voluntary contributions received after
February 28 shall not be used in rate calculations for the same calendar year.
(7) As used in sections 48-648 to 48-654, the term payroll means the total
amount of wages during a calendar year, except as otherwise provided in section
48-654, by which the combined tax was measured.
Sec. 15. Section 48-657, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-657 (1)(a) If any employer defaults in any payment of combined tax or
interest, the commissioner may make in any manner feasible and cause to be
filed as a secured transaction as provided in article 9, Uniform Commercial
Code, and in the real estate mortgage records of any county in which such
employer is engaged in business or owns real or personal property, a statement,
under oath, showing the amount of combined tax and interest in default, which
statement, when filed for record, shall operate as a lien and mortgage on all
of the real and personal property of the employer, subject only to the liens of
prior record, and the property of such employer shall be subject to seizure and
sale for the payment of such combined taxes and interest. Such lien on personal
property may be enforced or dissolved in the manner provided by article 9,
Uniform Commercial Code, and such liens on real estate may be enforced or
dissolved in the manner provided by Chapter 25, article 21, in the enforcing
and dissolving of real estate mortgages. This subdivision shall only apply to
liens filed prior to May 1, 1999.
-9-

LB265 LB265
2025 2025
(b) A lien for unpaid combined taxes filed or recorded pursuant to
subdivision (a) of this subsection shall lapse at the earlier of its expiration
date or the fifth anniversary of the filing or recording date, unless the
commissioner files a notice of continuation in the place of the original filing
or recording and with the appropriate filing officer in the manner provided for
in the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act before such lien
lapses. A notice of continuation shall include all of the information required
by the act, the date of the filing or recording of the original lien, and a
statement that the original lien is to be continued for ten years. Thereafter,
such lien shall be enforced and notices of continuation filed in accordance
with the act.
(c) On and after May 1, 1999, if any employer defaults in any payment of
combined tax or interest, the commissioner may file a lien against such
employer in accordance with the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and
Enforcement Act. Such liens shall set forth the amount of combined tax and
interest in default and shall be continued and enforced as provided in the
Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act.
(2) It shall be the duty of the State of Nebraska, or any department or
agency thereof, county boards, the contracting board of all cities, villages,
and school districts, all public boards empowered by law to enter into a
contract by public bidding for the erecting and finishing or the repairing of
any public building, bridge, highway, or other public structure or improvement,
and any officer or officers so empowered by law to enter into such contract to
provide in such contract that the person, persons, firm, or corporation to whom
the contract is awarded will pay to the Unemployment Compensation Fund of the
State of Nebraska and the Workforce Development Program Cash State Unemployment
Insurance Trust Fund unemployment combined tax and interest due under the
Employment Security Law on wages paid to individuals employed in the
performance of such contract.
(3) No contract referred to in subsection (2) of this section shall be
entered into by the State of Nebraska, a department or agency thereof, an
officer or officers, or a board referred to in such subsection unless the
contract contains the proviso mentioned in such subsection.
(4) Before final payment may be made on the final three percent of any
such contract awarded on or after June 1, 1957, the State of Nebraska,
department or agency thereof, officer or officers, or board awarding the
contract must have received from the contractor a written clearance from the
commissioner certifying that all payments then due of combined tax or interest
which may have arisen under such contract have been made by the contractor or
his or her subcontractor to the Unemployment Compensation Fund.
(5) The final three percent of any such contract referred to in subsection
(4) of this section may be paid if the contractor has supplied a bond with a
satisfactory surety company guaranteeing full payment to the Unemployment
Compensation Fund and the Workforce Development Program Cash State Unemployment
Insurance Trust Fund of all combined tax and interest due under the Employment
Security Law.
Sec. 16. Section 48-3405, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-3405 (1) The Sector Partnership Program Fund is created. The fund
terminates on July 1, 2025, and the State Treasurer shall transfer any money in
the fund on such date to the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund. shall be
administered by the Department of Labor. The fund shall be used to pursue
sector partnership activities, including, but not limited to, labor
availability and skills gap studies by the Department of Labor and the
Department of Economic Development pursuant to the Sector Partnership Program
Act. The fund may also be used for administrative costs of the Department of
Labor and the Department of Economic Development associated with sector
partnership activities.
(2) The fund shall consist of such money as is: (a) Transferred to the
fund from the Job Training Cash Fund and the Nebraska Training and Support Cash
Fund; (b) otherwise appropriated to the fund by the Legislature; (c) donated as
gifts, bequests, or other contributions to the fund from public or private
entities; and (d) made available by any department or agency of the United
States if so directed by such department or agency. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 17. Section 81-407, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-407 (1) The Workforce Development Program Cash Fund is hereby created.
The fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the Legislature.
(2) The Department of Labor shall administer the fund to provide workforce
development grants. The fund may be used:
(a) To provide workforce development grants;
(b) To pay the costs of administering the workforce development grant
program;
(c) To pay the costs of establishing, assessing, collecting, and
maintaining state unemployment insurance tax liability and payments;
(d) To pay unemployment benefits if determined necessary by the
Commissioner of Labor;
(e) To provide labor availability, skills gap, and workforce development
studies and reports by the Department of Labor; and
(f) For purposes of the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce
-10-

LB265 LB265
2025 2025
Development Pilot Investment Act.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(4)(a) As part of the workforce development grant program described in
subdivision (2)(a) of this section, the Nebraska Workforce Development Board
shall submit grant proposals to the Commissioner of Labor for the
commissioner's consideration. The board's proposals shall be submitted by April
30 of each year and shall set forth strategies and initiatives designed to
develop the workforce in the state. Each such proposal shall:
(i) Include a description of the purpose of the proposed grant and the
desired outcome; and
(ii) Include a method of measuring success for the proposed grant.
(b) The board may submit up to eighteen grant proposals per calendar year.
(c) The commissioner may approve, reject, or modify any grant proposal
submitted by the board. In the case of a rejection or modification of any grant
proposal, the commissioner shall provide written notice of the decision to the
board and include the rationale for the rejection or modification.
(d) The commissioner shall have the discretion to approve up to three
grant proposals per calendar year without the prior approval of the board. If
the total of the three proposals exceeds twenty-five percent of the unobligated
beginning annual balance of the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund, the
commissioner shall submit a report detailing the proposals to the board and to
the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature within
ninety days after approving such proposals.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, Nebraska Workforce Development Board
means the state workforce development board authorized by the federal Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act and established in Nebraska.
Sec. 18. Section 81-1201.21, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1201.21 (1) There is hereby created the Job Training Cash Fund. The
fund shall be under the direction of the Department of Economic Development.
Money may be transferred to the fund pursuant to subdivision (1)(b)(iii) of
section 48-621 and from the Cash Reserve Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. The department shall establish a subaccount for all money
transferred from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Job Training Cash Fund on or
after July 1, 2005.
(2) The money in the Job Training Cash Fund or the subaccount established
in subsection (1) of this section shall be used (a) to provide reimbursements
for job training activities, including employee assessment, preemployment
training, on-the-job training, training equipment costs, and other reasonable
costs related to helping industry and business locate or expand in Nebraska,
(b) to provide upgrade skills training of the existing labor force necessary to
adapt to new technology or the introduction of new product lines, or (c) as
provided in section 79-2308 , or (d) as provided in section 48-3405. The
department shall give a preference to job training activities carried out in
whole or in part within an enterprise zone designated pursuant to the
Enterprise Zone Act or an opportunity zone designated pursuant to the federal
Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, Public Law 115-97.
(3) The department shall establish a subaccount within the fund to provide
training grants for training employees and potential employees of businesses
that (a) employ twenty-five or fewer employees on the application date, (b)
employ, or train for potential employment, residents of rural areas of
Nebraska, or (c) are located in or employ, or train for potential employment,
residents of high-poverty areas as defined in section 81-1203. The department
shall calculate the amount of prior year investment income earnings accruing to
the fund and allocate such amount to the subaccount for training grants under
this subsection. The subaccount shall also be used as provided in the
Teleworker Job Creation Act. The department shall give a preference to training
grants for businesses located in whole or in part within an enterprise zone
designated pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act.
(4) On April 5, 2018, any funds that were dedicated to carrying out
sections 81-1210.01 to 81-1210.03 but were not yet expended shall be
transferred to the Intern Nebraska Cash Fund.
(5) Transfers may be made from the Job Training Cash Fund to the General
Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Job Training Cash
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 19. Section 84-612, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-612 (1) There is hereby created within the state treasury a fund known
as the Cash Reserve Fund which shall be under the direction of the State
Treasurer. The fund shall only be used pursuant to this section.
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer funds from the Cash Reserve Fund to
the General Fund upon certification by the Director of Administrative Services
that the current cash balance in the General Fund is inadequate to meet current
obligations. Such certification shall include the dollar amount to be
transferred. Any transfers made pursuant to this subsection shall be reversed
upon notification by the Director of Administrative Services that sufficient
funds are available.
(3) In addition to receiving transfers from other funds, the Cash Reserve
Fund shall receive federal funds received by the State of Nebraska for
-11-

LB265 LB265
2025 2025
undesignated general government purposes, federal revenue sharing, or general
fiscal relief of the state.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer fifteen million eight hundred
forty-one thousand dollars from the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund to the Cash
Reserve Fund on or before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred sixty-six million six
hundred seventy-three thousand five hundred eighty dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund on or after July 1,
2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(6) No funds shall be transferred from the Cash Reserve Fund to fulfill
the obligations created under the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act unless
the balance in the Cash Reserve Fund after such transfer will be at least equal
to five hundred million dollars.
(7) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the School Safety and Security Fund as soon as administratively
possible after September 2, 2023, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(8) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Risk Loss Trust on or before June 30, 2024, on such dates
and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(9) The State Treasurer shall transfer eleven million three hundred twenty
thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Health and Human Services
Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but on or before June 30, 2024, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(10) The State Treasurer shall transfer five hundred seventy-four million
five hundred thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Perkins County
Canal Project Fund on or before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(11) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million one hundred fifteen
thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Public Safety Cash Fund on
or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(12) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Revolving Fund
on or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(13) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million four hundred twenty-
five thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Nebraska Public Safety
Communication System Revolving Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but before June
30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(14) The State Treasurer shall transfer seventy million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Shovel-Ready Capital Recovery and Investment Fund on
or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(15) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Site and Building Development Fund on or after July 1,
2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(16) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Economic Development Cash Fund on or after July 1,
2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(17) The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred forty million dollars
from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund on or
after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(18) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Critical Infrastructure Facilities Cash Fund on or after
July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
(19) The State Treasurer shall transfer four hundred forty million dollars
from the General Fund to the Cash Reserve Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but
before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(20) The State Treasurer shall transfer four million dollars from the Cash
-12-

LB265 LB265
2025 2025
Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but before June 30,
2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator
of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(21) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-nine million four hundred
fifty-eight thousand eight hundred dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the
Nebraska Capital Construction Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but before June
30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(22) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million five hundred thousand
dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Materiel Division Revolving Fund on
or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(23) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Youth Outdoor Education Innovation Fund on or after July 1,
2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(24) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-eight million dollars from
the Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Fund to the Cash Reserve Fund on
or before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(25) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the State Insurance Fund on or before July 10, 2024, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(26) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million five hundred
thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Health and Human Services
Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but on or before June 30, 2025, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(27) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million two hundred fifty
thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the State Insurance Fund as soon
as possible after April 2, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(28) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Municipality Infrastructure Aid Fund on or after July 1,
2024, but before July 15, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(29) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-five million dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund on or before June
30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(30) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2025,
but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(31) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer two hundred million
dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1,
2026, but before June 30, 2027, if the balance of the Cash Reserve Fund on July
1, 2026, after accounting for the transfers in this section, does not fall
below sixteen percent of the amount appropriated, excluding encumbered and
certified reappropriations, from the General Fund for fiscal year 2026-27.
(32) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from the Cash
Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but before June 30,
2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator
of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 20. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,950,000 from the Workforce
Development Program Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 21. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 22. Original sections 48-602, 48-648, 48-649.01, 48-657, 48-3405,
81-407, 81-1201.21, and 84-612, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and
sections 48-622.01, 48-622.02, 48-626, and 48-649.03, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 23. The following sections are outright repealed: Section 48-622.03,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 22, 32, and 100, Legislative
Bill 264, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Sec. 24. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-13-